North Dakota, session 69, SB2094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 65-05-08 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. When disability benefits are discontinued, the organization may not begin payment
again unless the injured employee files a reapplication for disability benefits on a form
supplied by the organization. In case of reapplication, the award may commence no
more than thirty days before the date of reapplication. Disability benefits must be
reinstated upon proof by the injured employee that:
a. The employee has sustained a significant change in the compensable medical
condition; and
b. The employee has sustained an actual wage loss caused by the significant
change in the compensable medical condition; and
c. The employee has not retired or voluntarily withdrawn from the job market as
defined in section 65-05-09.3.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 65-05-09.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
65-05-09.3. Retirement presumption - Termination of benefits upon retirement.
1. An employee who has retired or voluntarily withdrawn from the labor force and who, at
that time, was not eligible to receive temporary total disability, temporary partial
Page No. 1 25.0016.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
disability, or permanent total disability benefits or to receive a rehabilitation allowance
from the organization is presumed retired from the labor market and is ineligible for
receipt of disability benefits under this title. The presumption may be rebutted by a
preponderance of the evidence; however, the subjective statement of an employee
that the employee is not retired is not sufficient in itself to rebut objective evidence of
retirement.
2. An injured employee who begins receiving social security retirement benefits or other
retirement benefits in lieu of social security retirement benefits or who attains
retirement age for social security retirement benefits, unless the employee proves the
employee is not eligible to receive social security retirement benefits or other benefits
in lieu of social security retirement benefits, is considered retired. The organization
may not pay any disability benefits, rehabilitation benefits, or supplementary benefits
to an employee who is considered retired; however, the employee remains eligible for
medical benefits, permanent partial impairment benefits, and the additional benefit
payable under section 65-05-09.4.
3. The organization retains liability for disability benefits, rehabilitation benefits,
permanent partial impairment benefits, and medical benefits for an injured employee
who is receiving social security retirement benefits or other retirement benefits in lieu
of social security retirement benefits or who attains retirement age for social security
retirement benefits, unless the employee is not eligible to receive social security
retirement benefits or other benefits in lieu of social security retirement benefits, and
who is gainfully employed and who suffers an injury arising out of and in the course of
that employment. The organization may not pay disability or rehabilitation benefits
under this subsection for more than three years, subject to section 65-05-09.2, for
injuries occurring after August 1, 1997.
4. If an employee is injured within the two years preceding the employee's presumed
retirement date, the organization shall pay disability benefits, rehabilitation benefits, or
a combination of both benefits for no more than two years. If the duration of disability
benefits, rehabilitation benefits, or a combination of both benefits extends beyond the
presumed retirement date, the organization shall convert the benefit to an additional
Page No. 2 25.0016.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
benefit payable at the date the disability ends or when two years of benefits have been
paid, whichever occurs first.
5. This section applies to an individual who begins receiving social security retirement
benefits or other retirement benefits in lieu of social security retirement benefits or who
attains retirement age for social security retirement benefits unless the employee
proves the employee is not eligible to receive social security retirement benefits or
other benefits in lieu of social security retirement benefits, after July 31, 1995.
6. An injured employee who has received disability benefits that have been discontinued
before retirement in accordance with this section is eligible to receive disability
benefits after retirement if the injured employee meets the reapplication criteria under
subsection 1 of section 65-05-08. Disability and rehabilitation benefits received under
this subsection may not exceed three years:
a. Is actively seeking employment;
b. Is available for gainful employment;
c. Has not rejected any job offer made by a former employer or any other bona fide
job offer made by another employer; and
d. Has not provided the employer, upon written request, with written notice of a
scheduled retirement date.
2. The presumption under this section does not apply to an employee who is
permanently and totally disabled.
SECTION 3. REPEAL. Sections 65-05-09.4 and 65-05-09.5 of the North Dakota Century
Code are repealed.
SECTION 4. APPLICATION. This Act applies to all workers' compensation claims
regardless of date of injury.
Page No. 3 25.0016.01000